Arkansas, session 2025, HB1020.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter 18, Subchapter 25, is
repealed.
6-18-2501. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas
Children's Educational Freedom Account Program”.

6-18-2502. Creation.
There is created the “Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account
Program”.

6-18-2503. Definitions.
*TNL014*
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Account” means an account that is comprised of funds
deposited on behalf of a participating student to pay for qualifying
educational expenses;
(2) “Account funds” means the funds deposited into an account on
behalf of a participating student;
(3) “Curriculum” means a complete course of study for a
particular content area or grade level;
(4) “Eligible student” means a resident of the State of Arkansas
who is eligible to enroll in a public elementary or secondary school, subject
to the timeline and parameters established under §§ 6-18-2506 and 6-18-2507;
(5) “Full academic curriculum” means all required core courses,
or the equivalent, as are offered in traditional public schools;
(6) “Full academic year” means at least one hundred seventy-
eight (178) days of instruction or the equivalent number of hours to what is
offered in traditional public schools;
(7) “Parent” means:
(A) A biological or adoptive parent;
(B) Legal guardian or custodian;
(C) Persons standing in loco parentis to a student; or
(D) Another person with legal authority to act on behalf
of an eligible student;
(8) “Participating school” means a private elementary school or
private secondary school that:
(A) Offers enrolled students a full academic curriculum
and full academic year experience; and
(B) Receives payments from Arkansas Children's Educational
Freedom Account Program accounts to provide goods and services that are
covered as qualifying expenses under this subchapter;
(9) “Participating service provider” means a person or an
entity, including a participating public or private school, that receives
payments from program accounts to provide goods and services that are covered
as qualifying expenses under this subchapter;
(10) “Participating student” means a student:
(A) Eligible to participate in the program; and
(B) For whom an account has been established under this
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
subchapter; and
(11) “Qualifying expenses” means:
(A)(i) For the 2023-2024 school year, “qualifying
expenses” shall include:
(a) Tuition;
(b) Fees;
(c) The cost of testing under this subchapter;
(d) The cost of required school uniforms, if
any, at a participating school; and
(e) Expenses determined by a participating
school to be necessary for the education of a participating student and
required to be paid by a participating student who is enrolled in the
participating school, including without limitation expenses related to:
(1) Supplies;
(2) Equipment;
(3) Access to technology; and
(4) Services provided by or at the
participating school.
(ii) “Qualifying expenses” shall not mean optional
expenses payable to a third party; and
(B) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year and
each year thereafter, “qualifying expenses” shall include those listed under
subdivision (11)(A) of this section and include the following:
(i) Instructional materials required for either in-
person or virtual instruction provided by a participating service provider or
participating school;
(ii) Instructional or tutoring services;
(iii) Curriculum;
(iv) Supplemental materials or supplies required by
a course of study for a particular content area;
(v) Fees for:
(a) Courses and associated examinations for
college credit; and
(b) Any examination related to postsecondary
educational institution admission;
(vi) Fees for:
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
(a) Courses and associated examinations for
career training; and
(b) Any examination required in order to
obtain an industry-based credential;
(vii) Educational services provided by a licensed or
accredited practitioner or participating service provider to a participating
student who is a student with a disability;
(viii) Fees for account management by participating
service providers;
(ix)(a) Technological devices used to meet a
participating student's educational needs, which shall not include:
(1) A television;
(2) A video game console or accessory;
or
(3) Home theater or audio equipment.
(b) Technological devices under subdivision
(11)(B)(ix)(a) of this section are subject to approval by the Department of
Education or a licensed physician;
(x) Costs associated with transportation to and from
a participating service provider or participating school; and
(xi) Any other educational expense approved by the
Division of Elementary and Secondary Education.

6-18-2504. State Board of Education — Rules.
(a) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
administer the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program under
this subchapter, which shall be subject to the rules adopted by the State
Board of Education.
(b) The rules adopted by the state board under this subchapter shall
include without limitation the:
(1) Process for determining the eligibility of students and
service providers, including the awarding of accounts to eligible students
and removal of unnecessary barriers or disincentives to participation by
potential participating service providers;
(2)(A) Process for conducting account and program audits,
including establishing the authority for the division to conduct or contract
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
for the auditing of accounts.
(B) The division shall establish a process for conducting
an audit of an entity receiving funds under this subchapter, including:
(i) An individual account;
(ii) A participating service provider; and
(iii) A participating school.
(C) At least one (1) time each year, the division shall
conduct random audits of the following according to the auditing process
established under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section:
(i) An individual account;
(ii) A participating service provider; and
(iii) A participating school;
(3) Authority of the division to:
(A) Deem any participating student ineligible for the
program; and
(B) Refer a case involving the misuse of account funds for
investigation to:
(i) The Attorney General; or
(ii) The Secretary of the Department of Inspector
General;
(4) Authority of the division to contract with a vendor or other
supplier for the administration of the program or parts of the program;
(5) Requirement that the program shall:
(A) Begin enrolling participating students no later than
the beginning of the 2023-2024 school year; and
(B) Be fully implemented to serve all Arkansas children
eligible to enroll in a public school by the beginning of the 2025-2026
school year;
(6) Establishment or creation of a contract for the establishment of
an online anonymous fraud reporting service, including without limitation a
telephone hotline;
(7) Requirement for a surety bond for a participating service provider
that receives more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in account
funds;
(8) Mechanism for the refunding of payments from service providers
back to the account from which they were paid;
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
(9) Required compliance with all state procurement laws and
procedures; and
(10) Means for preventing unreasonable inflation or fraud in
participating school tuition and fees.
(c) The following shall be forwarded to Arkansas Legislative Audit:
(1) An audit conducted under subdivision (b)(2) of this section
that identifies a potential misuse of account funds; and
(2) The referral of a case involving the misuse of account funds
for investigation to the Attorney General or the Secretary of the Department
of Inspector General under subdivision (b)(3)(B) of this section.
(d) To ensure that account funds under this subchapter provide for the
expansion of access to education options by reducing family financial burdens
and are not abused by service providers for financial gain, the state board
shall take all necessary action in establishing rules under this subchapter,
including without limitation the disqualification of a participating school
or a participating service provider.

6-18-2505. Account funds.
(a)(1) The Division of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
allocate annually to each participating student's account, from funds
appropriated to the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Fund or
otherwise made available for the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom
Account Program, an amount equal to ninety percent (90%) of the prior year's
statewide foundation funding allotted per student under § 6-20-2305.
(2) For the 2023-2024 school year and each school year
thereafter, a student who participated in the Succeed Scholarship Program
during the 2022-2023 school year shall receive one hundred percent (100%) of
the prior year's statewide foundation funding amount allotted per student
under § 6-20-2305 until:
(A) The participating student graduates from high school;
(B) The participating student receives a certificate of
completion; or
(C) An event that requires an account to be closed under
subdivision (f)(1) or (f)(2) of this section occurs.
(b)(1) For the 2023-2024 school year, on behalf of participating
students enrolled in participating schools or with participating service
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
providers and at the direction of a participating student’s parent, the
Department of Education shall make four (4) equal payments in quarterly
installments from the participating student’s account to the participating
school or participating service provider in which the participating student
is enrolled for tuition, fees, and costs associated with testing and
uniforms.
(2) The department may:
(A) Contract with a vendor or provider to manage the
payment system used for purposes of implementing this subsection; and
(B) Withhold up to five percent (5%) of funds allocated
for each account annually for the administration of the Arkansas Children’s
Educational Freedom Account Program.
(c) For the 2023-2024 school year, if a participating student is
enrolled full-time in a participating school or with a participating service
provider and the total amount of tuition, fees, testing, and uniform costs is
less than the amount determined under subsection (a) of this section, the
amount allocated to the student shall be the lesser amount.
(d) Account funds shall:
(1)(A) Not be refunded, rebated, or shared with a parent or
participating student in any manner.
(B) Any refund or rebate for goods or services purchased
with account funds shall be credited directly to the participating student’s
account; and
(2) Be used only for qualifying education expenses for a
participating student.
(e)(1) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year and each year
thereafter, the department shall develop a system for parents to direct
account funds to participating schools and participating service providers by
electronic funds transfer, automated clearinghouse transfer, debit card, or
another system.
(2) The department may:
(A) Contract with a vendor or provider, including without
limitation a private institution, to manage the payment system used for
purposes of implementing this subsection; and
(B) Withhold up to five percent (5%) of funds allocated
for each account annually for the administration of the Arkansas Children’s
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
Educational Freedom Account Program.
(3) The department shall:
(A) Not adopt a payment system under this subsection that
relies exclusively on requiring parents to be reimbursed for out-of-pocket
expenses; and
(B) Ensure a payment system developed under this
subsection provides maximum flexibility to parents by facilitating direct
payments to participating service providers and requests for preapproval of
and reimbursements for qualifying expenses.
(f)(1) An account shall remain in force, and any unused funds shall
roll over from quarter-to-quarter and from year-to-year, until:
(A) A parent withdraws his or her participating student
from the program;
(B) A participating student graduates from high school; or
(C) The end of the school year if a participating student
turns twenty-one (21) years of age, whichever occurs first.
(2) An account shall be closed before an event occurs under
subdivision (f)(1) of this section if the State Board of Education finds:
(A) A substantial misuse of funds; or
(B) That a parent has failed to comply with this
subchapter or state board rules governing the Arkansas Children’s Educational
Freedom Account Program.
(3)(A) Any unused funds shall revert to the division and be
allocated to fund other accounts.
(B)(i) There shall be a maximum amount of funds allowed to
remain in each participating student's account.
(ii) The state board may establish rules to determine
the:
(a) Maximum amount of funds allowed under
subdivision (f)(3)(B)(i) of this section; and
(b) Process by which account funds will be
returned to the appropriate fund within the department.
(g) Account funds shall not:
(1) Constitute taxable income of the parent or the participating
student; and
(2) Be claimed as a credit, deduction, exemption, or rebate.
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
(h) The division shall create procedures to ensure that a fair process
exists to determine whether a participating student is no longer eligible for
participation in the Arkansas Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program,
including without limitation a participating student who is no longer
eligible for participation in the Arkansas Children’s Educational Freedom
Account Program due to his or her failure to demonstrate academic achievement
or academic growth.
(i)(1) If the division bars a student from participating in the
Arkansas Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program, it shall notify the
participating student and his or her parent of its decision within three (3)
days of its decision.
(2) A parent may appeal the division’s decision to bar him or
her from receiving payments from accounts to the state board according to
rules established by the state board.
(j) The state board may promulgate rules to implement this subchapter.

6-18-2506. Student eligibility — Initial and continuing.
(a) A student is initially eligible for an account if the student:
(1) Has a parent who is a resident of the State of Arkansas as
defined by § 6-18-202;
(2) Is eligible to enroll in a public elementary or secondary
school in this state; and
(3) Meets the following criteria:
(A)(i) For the 2023-2024 school year, a student shall be
eligible if the student is at least one (1) of the following:
(a) A student with a disability identified
under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et
seq., as it existed on January 1, 2023;
(b) A student who is considered homeless under
the McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, 42 U.S.C. § 11431 et seq., as it
existed on January 1, 2023;
(c) A foster child or a former foster child;
(d)(1) A student who is currently
participating in the Succeed Scholarship Program, § 6-41-901 et seq.
[repealed].
(2) A student who participated in the
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
Succeed Scholarship Program during the 2022-2023 school year and elects to
enroll in the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program under
this subchapter shall receive one hundred percent (100%) of the prior year's
statewide foundation funding amount allotted per student under § 6-20-2305
until:
(A) The participating student
graduates from high school;
(B) The participating student
receives a certificate of completion; or
(C) An event that requires an
account to be closed under § 6-18-2505(f)(1) or § 6-18-2505(f)(2) occurs;
(e) A child of active-duty uniformed service
personnel, as identified under Title 10, Title 32, Title 33, or Title 42 of
the United States Code;
(f) A student who was enrolled in the previous
school year in a:
(1) Public school that has a rating of
“F” under §§ 6-15-2105 and 6-15-2106 and State Board of Education rules; or
(2) Public school district classified as
in need of Level 5 — Intensive support under § 6-15-2913 or § 6-15-2915; or
(g) A student who is enrolling in kindergarten
for the first time.
(ii)(a) For the 2023-2024 school year, a
maximum of one and five-tenths percent (1.5%) of the 2022-2023 total public
school student enrollment may be approved to participate in the Arkansas
Children's Educational Freedom Account Program.
(b) However, the number of students approved
to participate in the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program
under subdivision (a)(3)(A)(ii)(a) of this section shall not exceed the
amount of funds made available for the Arkansas Children's Educational
Freedom Account Program;
(B)(i) For the 2024-2025 school year, student eligibility shall
expand to include students who meet at least one (1) of the following:
(a) All students who are eligible under subdivision
(a)(3)(A) of this section;
(b) Students who were enrolled in the prior school
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
year in public schools rated “D” or “F” under §§ 6-15-2105 and 6-15-2106 and
state board rules; and
(c) Students whose parents are:
(1) Veterans as identified under Title 38 of
the United States Code;
(2) In the uniformed service reserve
components;
(3) First responders; or
(4) Law enforcement officers.
(ii)(a) For the 2024-2025 school year, a maximum of
three percent (3%) of the 2022-2023 total public school student enrollment
may be approved to participate in the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom
Account Program.
(b) The number of students approved to participate
in the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program under
subdivision (a)(3)(B)(ii)(a) of this section shall:
(1) Include any students who are continuing to
participate in the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program
from the 2023-2024 school year; and
(2) Not exceed the amount of funds made
available for the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program;
and
(C)(i) For the 2025-2026 school year and each year thereafter,
any resident of this state who is eligible to enroll in a public elementary
or secondary school shall be eligible.
(ii) Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, there shall
be no limitation on student participation in the Arkansas Children's
Educational Freedom Account Program.
(b) In any year in which funds are insufficient to fund all
applications for new accounts, first priority shall be given to students who
are eligible under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section, followed by
students eligible under subdivision (a)(3)(B) of this section.
(c) In any year in which funds are insufficient to fund all continuing
accounts, priority shall be given to students who have been in the Arkansas
Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program the longest after priority has
been given to students identified under subsection (b) of this section.
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
(d) The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules:
(1) For the implementation of the Arkansas Children’s
Educational Freedom Account Program; and
(2) To effectively and efficiently administer the Arkansas
Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program, including without limitation:
(A) The awarding of funds to participating students;
(B) The oversight of the Arkansas Children’s Educational
Freedom Account Program; and
(C) Any other necessary aspects for the operation of the
Arkansas Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program.
(e)(1) Except as provided under subdivision (e)(2) of this section, a
participating student may only participate in and receive funds from one (1)
of the following:
(A) The Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account
Program established by this subchapter; or
(B) The Philanthropic Investment in Arkansas Kids Program
Act, § 6-18-2301 et seq.
(2)(A) A student with a disability as described by subdivision
(a)(3)(A)(i)(a) of this section who has an annual family income that is less
than or equal to two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty guidelines
as determined annually in the Federal Register by the United States
Department of Health and Human Services under 42 U.S.C. § 9902(2), as
required under the Philanthropic Investment in Arkansas Kids Program may
receive funds from both the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account
Program established by this subchapter and the Philanthropic Investment in
Arkansas Kids Program.
(B) However, a student who qualifies under subdivision
(e)(2)(A) of this section may receive funds from both the Arkansas Children's
Educational Freedom Account Program established by this subchapter and the
Philanthropic Investment in Arkansas Kids Program only to the extent
necessary to cover qualifying expenses.
(f) The student's parent shall submit an application for an account to
the Department of Education in accordance with Arkansas Children’s
Educational Freedom Account Program timelines established by the department.
(g)(1) The department shall create a standard form that a parent may
submit to establish his or her child's eligibility for the program.
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
(2) The department shall ensure that the standard form required
under subdivision (g)(1) of this section is publicly available and may be
submitted through various sources, including without limitation the internet.
(h)(1) As part of the application, a parent shall sign an agreement
promising each of the following without limitation:
(A)(i) Not to enroll his or her child full-time in a
public school while his or her child is participating in the Arkansas
Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program.
(ii) However, a participating student may take
approved courses at a public school participating as an approved provider;
(B) To use account funds only for qualifying expenses of
the participating student;
(C) To comply with all Arkansas Children’s Educational
Freedom Account Program requirements as established by the department
according to state board rules; and
(D) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, in the case
of any account used for qualifying educational expenses not associated with
full-time enrollment in a participating school or a participating service
provider, to agree to provide an education for his or her participating
student in at least the subjects of English language arts, mathematics,
social studies, and science.
(2) The signed agreement required under subdivision (h)(1) of
this section shall satisfy the compulsory school attendance requirements of §
6-18-201.
(i) The division shall:
(1) Continue making deposits into a participating student’s
account until:
(A) The division determines that the participating student
is no longer an eligible student;
(B) The division determines that there was substantial
misuse of account funds, as defined by the state board;
(C) A parent or a participating student withdraws from the
Arkansas Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program;
(D) A participating student enrolls full-time in a public
school;
(E) A participating student graduates from high school; or
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
(F) A participating student completes the school year in
the year in which he or she turns twenty-one (21) years of age;
(2) Provide parents with a written explanation of the:
(A) Allowable uses of funds;
(B) Responsibilities of parents; and
(C) Duties of the division and the role of any private
financial management firms or other private organizations that the department
may contract with to administer the Arkansas Children’s Educational Freedom
Account Program or any aspect of the Arkansas Children’s Educational Freedom
Account Program; and
(3) Annually fund a participating student’s account as funds are
available and in accordance with this law and state board rules.
(j)(1) Upon notice to the division, a participating student may choose
to stop receiving funds disbursed under this subchapter and enroll full-time
in a public school.
(2)(A) Enrolling as a full-time student in a public school shall
result in the immediate suspension of payment of additional funds into the
participating student’s account.
(B)(i) However, for accounts that have been open for at
least one (1) full academic year, the account shall remain open and active
for the parent of a former participating student to make qualifying
expenditures to educate the student from funds remaining in the account.
(ii) When no funds remain in the former
participating student’s account, the division may close the account.
(3)(A) If a former participating student decides to return to
the Arkansas Children’s Educational Freedom Account Program and is a current
eligible student, payments into the former participating student’s existing
account may resume if the account is still open and active.
(B) A new account may be established if the former
participating student’s previous account was closed.
(k) The state board and the department may adopt rules to provide the
least disruptive process for a participating student who desires to stop
receiving funds disbursed under this subchapter and enroll full-time in a
public school.

6-18-2507. Participating schools and participating service providers —
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
Eligibility — Participation.
(a) To be eligible to participate in the Arkansas Children's
Educational Freedom Account Program, a private school shall:
(1)(A) Either:
(i) Meet accreditation requirements established by
the State Board of Education, the Arkansas Nonpublic School Accrediting
Association, Inc., or its successor, or another accrediting association
recognized by the state board; or
(ii) Be an associate member of or have applied for
accreditation by the Arkansas Nonpublic School Accrediting Association, Inc.,
or its successor, or another accrediting association recognized by the state
board.
(B) A private school shall no longer be eligible if:
(i) The private school has not received
accreditation within four (4) years of becoming eligible;
(ii) The state board determines, based on
information provided by the accrediting association, that the private school
is ineligible or unable to continue the accreditation process; or
(iii) It becomes impossible for the private school
to obtain accreditation within four (4) years.
(C) A private school that becomes ineligible under this
section shall regain eligibility when the private school receives
accreditation and is approved by the state board;
(2)(A) Demonstrate fiscal soundness by having been in operation
for at least one (1) school year or providing the Department of Education
with a statement by a certified public accountant confirming that the private
school is insured and the private school has sufficient capital or credit to
operate in the upcoming school year.
(B) In lieu of a statement provided under subdivision
(a)(2)(A) of this section, a surety bond or letter of credit for the amount
equal to the account funds needed by the private school for any quarter may
be filed with the department;
(3) Certify that it will not discriminate on any basis
prohibited by 42 U.S.C. § 2000d, as it existed on January 1, 2023;
(4) Remain academically accountable to a parent for meeting the
educational needs of his or her participating student;
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
(5) Employ or contract only with teachers who hold at least
baccalaureate degrees or have equivalent documented experience;
(6) Comply with all applicable state laws and rules governing
private schools;
(7) Adhere to the tenets of its published disciplinary
procedures before expelling a participating student;
(8) Meet any other eligibility criteria set by state board
rules;
(9) Comply with all applicable health and safety laws and rules;
(10) Hold valid occupancy of buildings as required by the
relevant municipality in which the private school is located;
(11) Exclude any individual from employment who may reasonably
pose a risk to the appropriate use of funds disbursed under this subchapter;
(12) Complete background checks and fingerprinting for any
employee working in the private school; and
(13) Maintain for audit purposes a background check of all
employees.
(b)(1) A public school district or open-enrollment public charter
school located in the State of Arkansas that previously enrolled a student
who is now a participating student under this subchapter shall provide the
participating school or participating service provider that has enrolled the
student who was previously enrolled in the public school district or open-
enrollment public charter school a copy of the participating student's school
records to the extent permitted under the provisions of the Family
Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. § 1232g, as it existed
on January 1, 2023.
(2) The requirement under subdivision (b)(1) of this section
that a public school district or open-enrollment public charter school in
which a participating student was previously enrolled be located in the State
of Arkansas does not apply to a student currently participating in the
Succeed Scholarship Program, § 6-41-901 et seq.
(c) By not later than June 30, 2024, the state board shall adopt rules
providing for program eligibility for participating service providers that
are not participating schools, including without limitation an application
process that is executed, at a minimum, annually for the purpose of
determining service provider eligibility.
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
(d) The department shall maintain a list of service providers
determined to be eligible to participate in the program and make the list
available on the department's website.
(e) The department may bar a service provider from accepting payments
from accounts and restrict the service provider’s ability to serve additional
participating students if the department determines that the participating
service provider has:
(1) Failed to maintain continuing eligibility criteria
established by the state board;
(2) Demonstrated a gross or persistent lack of academic
competence, as defined by the state board;
(3) Intentionally or substantially misrepresented information or
failed to refund any overpayments in a timely manner, as defined by the state
board; or
(4) Routinely failed to provide participating students with
promised educational goods or services, as defined by the state board.
(f)(1) The department shall create procedures to ensure that a fair
process exists to determine whether a participating service provider may be
barred from receiving payments from accounts under subsection (e) of this
section.
(2) If the department bars a participating service provider from
receiving payments from accounts under this section, it shall notify parents
and participating students of its decision within three (3) days of its
decision on the department's website and through attempted individual
communications.
(3) A participating service provider may appeal the department’s
decision to bar it from receiving payments from accounts to the state board.
(g) The following may be subject to review and an audit of funds
received related to this subchapter and as directed by the state board:
(1) A participating service provider; and
(2) A participating school.
(h) The state board shall promulgate rules to implement this
subchapter.

6-18-2508. Students with disabilities.
The Department of Education shall ensure that parents of students with
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
disabilities identified under the Individuals with Disabilities Education
Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2023, receive:
(1) Notice that participation in the Arkansas Children’s
Educational Freedom Account Program is a parental placement under 20 U.S.C. §
1412, as it existed on January 1, 2023; and
(2) An explanation of the rights that parentally placed students
possess under the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §
1400 et seq., as it existed on January 1, 2023, and any applicable state laws
and rules.

6-18-2509. Testing.
(a)(1) Each participating school and participating service provider
shall provide for each participating student to annually take an assessment
approved by the State Board of Education, which shall include:
(A) An examination identified by the state board that is
required for students attending public schools; or
(B) A state board-approved nationally recognized norm-
referenced test or a statewide assessment, which measures, at a minimum,
literacy and math.
(2)(A) However, a participating student who has an
individualized service plan and is determined by a participating private
school to need an exemption from standardized testing due to the existence of
a significant cognitive disability is not required to take the test required
under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.
(B) If a student is not required to take the test required
under subdivision (a)(1) of this section, a participating private school
shall annually make provision for the student to take an alternate assessment
approved by the state board or prepare a portfolio that provides information
on a student's progress to the student's parent or guardian.
(b) For a participating student who is served by a participating
service provider that is not a private school that is a participating school
during or after the 2024-2025 school year, his or her parent shall provide
for his or her child who is a participating student to take an approved
examination meeting the standards established under subsection (a) of this
section.
(c)(1) The Department of Education shall develop a process for the
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
collection and aggregate reporting of the results of examinations required
under this section, which shall include the public dissemination of the
results collected by participating private schools and participating service
providers.
(2) However, the reporting required under subdivision (c)(1) of
this section shall:
(A) Not identify any individual student; and
(B) Ensure that the summary results of the examinations
required under this section are provided to parents of participating
students.

6-18-2510. Reports.
(a)(1) Not later than September 30 of each year, the Department of
Education shall submit a written report regarding the implementation of the
Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program to the:
(A) Legislative Council, or if the General Assembly is in
session, the Joint Budget Committee;
(B) House Committee on Education; and
(C) Senate Committee on Education.
(2) The department may contract with an outside entity to
compile the report required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section.
(b) The report required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall
include the following information without limitation:
(1) The total number of students currently participating in the
program;
(2) A list of all participating schools and participating
service providers;
(3) The total student enrollment of each participating school
and the percentage of the total enrollment of each school represented by
participating students;
(4) Aggregated test result data for participating students, from
the most recent year available;
(5) The percentage of funds used for each type of qualifying
expense;
(6) An analysis of the program's fiscal impact;
(7) The retention rates for participating students enrolled in
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
participating schools;
(8) The results of a parental satisfaction survey that shall be
administered by the department; and
(9) Other relevant data as determined by the department.

6-18-2511. Legal proceedings.
(a) There shall be no liability on the part of the Department of
Education or the state or of any public school or public school district
based on the award of or use of an account under this subchapter.
(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed as a waiver of
sovereign immunity or any other defenses available to the State of Arkansas.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-20-2305(b), concerning education
categories of funding in addition to state foundation funding aid, is amended
to add an additional subdivision read as follows:
(7)(A) For the 2025-2026 school year and each school year
thereafter, special education funding shall be three thousand eighty hundred
sixty-two dollars ($3,862) multiplied by the number of students who receive
special education and related services required by an individualized
education plan.
(B) Funding for students who receive special education and
related services required by an individualized education plan under
subdivision (b)(7)(A) of this section shall be distributed based on rules
promulgated by the state board.
(C) Funding for students who receive special education and
related services required by an individualized education plan shall not be
incorporated into the state foundation funding aid amount established under
subsection (a) of this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 9-28-113(j), concerning the use of state
and federal funding for the placement of a foster child in a nonpublic
school, is amended to read as follows:
(j)(1) Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this section, if it is
in the best interest of the child, a foster child may be placed in a
nonpublic school, including a private, parochial, or home school.
(2)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (j)(2)(B) of this
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
section, state State or federal funding shall not be used for the placement
of a foster child in a nonpublic school, including a private, parochial, or
home school.
(B) The prohibition under subdivision (j)(2)(A) of this
section shall not apply to a foster child who receives an Arkansas Children's
Educational Freedom Account Fund under § 6-18-2501 et seq.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1277 is repealed.
19-5-1277. Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Arkansas Children’s Educational Freedom Account
Fund”.
(b)(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, for fiscal year
2024 and each fiscal year thereafter, in addition to all other amounts
required under the Arkansas Children's Educational Freedom Account Program,
the Department of Education shall include in its annual budget request
submitted under § 19-4-301 et seq., and the Governor shall include in each
recommendation submitted to the General Assembly under § 19-4-201, an
appropriation to the Department of Education, Division of Elementary and
Secondary Education, for the greater of an amount not less than two percent
(2%) of:
(A) Net public school enrollment adjusted for state
foundation funding aid purposes; or
(B) The total number of eligible program applications
received by the division, if available, multiplied by the prior year's
statewide net foundation funding aid allotted per student.
(2) The amount appropriated under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section shall be transferred by the division to the fund to be used solely to
meet the obligations required under the program, except as otherwise provided
in this section.
(3) The Governor shall include a recommendation, as required
under § 19-4-201, that the total amount of funds appropriated to the division
that was not transferred to the fund during the previous fiscal year due to
an accumulated balance from previous fiscal years as provided under
subsection (c) of this section be reappropriated for the subsequent fiscal
01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014

As Engrossed: H1/16/25 HB1020
year.
(c) Each fiscal year, the amount required to be requested and
recommended for appropriation under subsection (b) of this section shall be
reduced by the sum of:
(1) Any unused, accumulated amounts transferred to the fund due
to the requirements under this subsection from previous years; and
(2) Any unused appropriations made to the department due to the
requirements under this subsection that were not transferred to the fund due
to an accumulated balance from previous years.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 19, Chapter 5, Subchapter 12, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
19-5-1287. Community Schools Act Fund.
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a miscellaneous
fund to be known as the “Community Schools Act Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) General revenues authorized by law; and
(2) Moneys obtained from private or public grants, gifts,
interagency transfers, or donations that are designated to be credited to the
fund.
(c) The fund shall be used by the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education in furtherance of the purposes established under the Community
Schools Act, § 6-15-3001 et seq.
(d) Moneys remaining in the fund at the end of each fiscal year shall
carry forward and be made available for the purposes stated in this section
in the next fiscal year.

/s/A. Collins







01-16-2025 15:41:45 TNL014